morpheme-stripper/apertium-id-ms-stripmorpheme.lexc
LEXICON adja_prefix
@P.DERADJ.positive@                                                                     adjective ;         ! eg. "cantik" [beautiful]
@P.DERADJ.positive@@P.REDUP.on@000:@P.DERADJ.positive@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{              adjective ;         ! eg. "cantik-cantik" [beautiful (addressing to plural references)]
@P.DERADJ.positive@@P.REDUP.on@000:@P.DERADJ.positive@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{              verb ;              ! eg. "tulis - meN- + tulis" [anything related to writing]
000@P.DERADJ.sup@:ter@P.DERADJ.sup@                                                     adjective ;         ! eg. "ter- + cantik" [the most beautiful (equally grammatical with "paling cantik")]
00@P.DERADJ.manner@:ke@P.DERADJ.manner@                                                 noun ;              ! eg. "ke- + ibu + -an" [motherly]
00@P.DERADJ.manner@@P.REDUP.on@000:ke@P.DERADJ.manner@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{              noun ;              ! eg. "ke- + ibu-ibu + -an" [like mothers]
00@P.DERADJ.exceed@:ke@P.DERADJ.exceed@                                                 adjective ;         ! eg. "ke- + cantik + an" [too beautiful (equally grammatical with "terlalu cantik")]
@P.DERADJ.mimic@@P.REDUP.on@000:@P.DERADJ.mimic@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                    noun ;              ! eg. "mobil-mobil + -an" [like cars (a toy car)]
00@P.DERADJ.uni@:se@P.DERADJ.uni@                                                       adjective ;         ! eg. "se- + cantik" [as beautiful as]
00@P.DERADJ.possib@@P.REDUP.on@000:se@P.DERADJ.possib@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{              adjective ;         ! eg. "se- + besar-besar + -nya" [as big as something can possibly be]
00@P.FLAG.dernoun@@P.DERADJ.uni@:se@P.FLAG.dernoun@@P.DERADJ.uni@                       noun_alternation ;   ! eg. "se- + ibu" [one/same mother]


LEXICON va_preprefix
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.imperf@000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.imperf@me%^N                                              va_prefix1 ;
@P.VOICE.pv@@P.ASPECT.imperf@00:@P.VOICE.pv@@P.ASPECT.imperf@di                                                  va_prefix1 ;
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.imperf@@P.REDUP.on@000000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.imperf@@P.REDUP.on@me%^N%^%[%[%{           va_prefix1 ;
@P.VOICE.pv@@P.ASPECT.imperf@@P.REDUP.on@00000:@P.VOICE.pv@@P.ASPECT.imperf@@P.REDUP.on@di%^%[%[%{               va_prefix1 ;
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@                                                          verb ;
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@ber                                                    verb ;
@P.VOICE.pv@@P.ASPECT.perf@000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@ter                                                    verb ;
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.REDUP.on@000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                       verb ;
@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.REDUP.on@000000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@ber@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                 verb ;
@P.VOICE.pv@@P.ASPECT.perf@@P.REDUP.on@000000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.ASPECT.perf@ter@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                 verb ;
@P.VOICE.av@@P.VERBVAR.vbhaver@000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.VERBVAR.vbhaver@ber                                            va_prefix2 ;
@P.VOICE.av@@P.VERBVAR.vbhaver@@P.REDUP.on@000000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.VERBVAR.vbhaver@ber@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{         va_prefix2 ;
@P.VOICE.av@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@:@P.VOICE.av@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@                                                  va_prefix3 ;
@P.VOICE.av@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@@P.REDUP.on@000:@P.VOICE.av@@P.VERBVAR.vbser@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{               va_prefix3 ;


LEXICON va_prefix1
0000@P.VERBVAR.vbser@:p%^Kper@P.VERBVAR.vbser@                                            n0 ;
                                                                                          n0 ;

LEXICON va_prefix2
                                                                                          adjective ;
@P.FLAG.dernoun@                                                                          noun_alternation ;

LEXICON va_prefix3
@P.MARK.bare@                                                                             adjective ;
@P.MARK.bare@                                                                             noun ;



LEXICON n0
@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@000:@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                                    noun ;
@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@000:@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                                    numeral ;
@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@000:@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                                    adjective ;
@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@000:@D.REDUP@@P.REDUP.on@%^%[%[%{                                    verb ;
                                                                                          noun ;
                                                                                          numeral ;
                                                                                          adjective ;
                                                                                          verb ;




!! -- Section: PREFIX

LEXICON branching
@R.FLAG.numinfl@            numa_suffix ;
@R.FLAG.dernoun@            na_suffix ;
@R.FLAG.deradj@             adja_suffix ;
@R.FLAG.verbinfl@           va_suffix ;
@D.FLAG@                    tagging ;

LEXICON na_suffix
@R.MARK.bare@@R.POS.n@@P.DERNOUN.bare@                                                   f ;
00@R.MARK.bare@@P.DERNOUN.ent@:an@R.MARK.bare@@P.DERNOUN.ent@                            f ;
00@R.MARK.pen@@P.DERNOUN.act@:an@R.MARK.pen@@P.DERNOUN.act@                              f ;
@R.MARK.pen@                                                                             f ;
00@R.MARK.ke@@P.DERNOUN.abstract@:an@R.MARK.ke@@P.DERNOUN.abstract@                      f ;
00@R.MARK.per@@P.DERNOUN.theme@:an@R.MARK.per@@P.DERNOUN.theme@                          f ;


LEXICON numa_suffix
@D.REDUP@                                                                                                     f ;
000@D.REDUP@@R.DERNUM.ord@@P.DERNUM.ref@:nya@D.REDUP@@R.DERNUM.ord@@P.DERNUM.ref@                             f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.DERNUM.ref@" 0:n 0:y 0:a>             f ;
belas@D.REDUP@                                                                                                f ;
<b e l a s [0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.DERNUM.ref@" 0:n 0:y 0:a>   f ;

LEXICON adja_suffix
@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.positive@@R.POS.adj@                                                                                    f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@R.POS.adj@" "@R.DERADJ.positive@">      f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH m e %^N" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.POS.v@" "@R.DERADJ.positive@">             f ;
@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.sup@                                                                                                    f ;
<"@D.REDUP@" ["@R.DERADJ.exceed@" | "@R.DERADJ.manner@" | "@R.DERADJ.mimic@"] 0:a 0:n>                                     f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@R.DERADJ.manner@" 0:a 0:n>              f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.DERADJ.mimic@" 0:a 0:n>                            f ;
@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.possib@000:@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.possib@nya                                                                f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@R.DERADJ.possib@" 0:n 0:y 0:a>                       f ;
@D.REDUP@@R.DERADJ.uni@                                                                                                    f ;


LEXICON va_suffix
@D.REDUP@000@P.OBJ.caus@:@D.REDUP@kan@P.OBJ.caus@                                                                   f ;
@D.REDUP@0@P.OBJ.appl@:@D.REDUP@i@P.OBJ.appl@                                                                       f ;
@D.REDUP@@D.MARK@:@D.REDUP@@D.MARK@                                                                                 f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@P.OBJ.caus@" 0:k 0:a 0:n>        f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@P.OBJ.appl@" 0:i>                f ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@" "@D.MARK@">                        f ;


LEXICON f
@D.REDUP@        tagging ;
<[0 .x. "}" "%^REHYPH" "]" "^" 2 "^]"  ] "@R.REDUP.on@" "@C.REDUP@" "@P.NUM.pl@">        tagging ;


!! -- Section: TAGGING
!! but aslo includes pronoun proclitic and particle

LEXICON tagging
%<vblex%>@R.POS.v@:0@R.POS.v@                                 check_voice ;
%<n%>@R.POS.n@:0@R.POS.n@                                     check_voice ;
%<adj%>@R.POS.adj@:0@R.POS.adj@                               check_voice ;
%<adv%>@R.POS.adv@:0@R.POS.adv@                               check_voice ;
%<num%>@R.POS.num@:0@R.POS.num@                               check_voice ;
%<prn%>@R.POS.prn@:0@R.POS.prn@                               check_voice ;
%<cnjsub%>@R.POS.cnjsub@:0@R.POS.cnjsub@                      check_voice ;
%<cnjcoo%>@R.POS.cnjcoo@:0@R.POS.cnjcoo@                      check_voice ;
%<det%>0@R.POS.det@:0@R.POS.det@                              check_voice ;
%<mod%>0@R.POS.mod@:0@R.POS.mod@                              check_voice ;
%<ij%>0@R.POS.interjection@:0@R.POS.interjection@             check_voice ;
%<qst%>0@R.POS.question@:0@R.POS.question@                    check_voice ;
%<part%>0@R.POS.part@:0@R.POS.part@                           check_voice ;
%<pr%>0@R.POS.pr@:0@R.POS.pr@                                 check_voice ;

LEXICON check_voice
%<actv%>@R.VOICE.av@:0@R.VOICE.av@                            check_aspect ;
%<pasv%>@R.VOICE.pv@:0@R.VOICE.pv@                            check_aspect ;
@D.VOICE@                                                     check_aspect ;

LEXICON check_aspect
%<perf%>@R.ASPECT.perf@:0@R.ASPECT.perf@                      check_verbvariance ;
%<imp%>@R.ASPECT.imperf@:0@R.ASPECT.imperf@                   check_verbvariance ;
@D.ASPECT@                                                    check_verbvariance ;

LEXICON check_verbvariance
%<vbser%>@R.VERBVAR.vbser@:0@R.VERBVAR.vbser@                 check_transitivity ;
%<vbhaver%>@R.VERBVAR.vbhaver@:0@R.VERBVAR.vbhaver@           check_transitivity ;
@D.VERBVAR@                                                   check_transitivity ;

LEXICON check_transitivity
%<caus%>@R.OBJ.caus@:0@R.OBJ.caus@                            check_noun_type ;
%<appl%>@R.OBJ.appl@:0@R.OBJ.appl@                            check_noun_type ;
@D.OBJ@                                                       check_noun_type ;

LEXICON check_noun_type
%<ent%>@R.DERNOUN.ent@:0@R.DERNOUN.ent@                       check_numeral_type ;
%<actio%>@R.DERNOUN.act@:0@R.DERNOUN.act@                     check_numeral_type ;
%<actor%>@R.DERNOUN.actor@:0@R.DERNOUN.actor@                 check_numeral_type ;
%<theme%>@R.DERNOUN.theme@:0@R.DERNOUN.theme@                 check_numeral_type ;
%<abstract%>@R.DERNOUN.abstract@:0@R.DERNOUN.abstract@        check_numeral_type ;
%<bare%>@R.DERNOUN.bare@:0@R.DERNOUN.bare@                    check_numeral_type ;
@D.DERNOUN@                                                   check_numeral_type ;

LEXICON check_numeral_type
%<card%>@R.DERNUM.card@:0@R.DERNUM.card@                      check_person ;
%<ord%>@R.DERNUM.ord@:0@R.DERNUM.ord@                         check_person ;
%<coll%>@R.DERNUM.coll@:0@R.DERNUM.coll@                      check_person ;
%<ref%>@R.DERNUM.ref@:0@R.DERNUM.ref@                         check_person ;
%<uni%>@R.DERNUM.uni@:0@R.DERNUM.uni@                         check_person ;
@D.DERNUM@                                                    check_person ;
